Missouri, session 2026, HB2321.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2052, to read as follows:
1.2052. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "AI-Generated
Content Accountability and Privacy Protection Act of 2026".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Algorithmically generated or altered content", any image, video, or audio
recording that has been wholly or substantially created, altered, or synthesized by
automated or algorithmic means, including through the use of artificial intelligence or
machine learning technologies, in a manner that materially changes a person's
appearance, voice, or likeness;
(2) "Consent", explicit, informed, freely given, and revocable authorization by
the person whose image, likeness, or voice is depicted. Consent shall be documented in
writing, electronically, or through another verifiable method;
(3) "Online public communication platform", any service or website that allows
users to share content with the general public.
3. (1) Any person who knowingly publishes, distributes, or makes publicly
available any algorithmically generated or altered content that represents a depicted
individual without the consent of that individual shall be subject to imprisonment for
not more than two years or a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars, or both.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2321 2
(2) If the violation under subdivision (1) of this subsection occurs through an
online public communication platform, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for
not more than two years or a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars, or both.
4. (1) Any person who knowingly creates, publishes, or distributes any
algorithmically generated or altered content of a sexual or pornographic nature without
the consent of a depicted individual shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than
two years or a fine of not more than sixty-five thousand dollars, or both.
(2) If the violation under subdivision (1) of this subsection occurs through an
online public communication platform, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for
not more than three years or a fine of not more than eighty thousand dollars, or both.
(3) If the violation under subdivision (1) of this subsection involves the
distribution of an algorithmically generated or altered content that is sexual or
pornographic in nature and results in serious harm to the dignity, reputation, or safety
of the depicted individual results, the person shall be subject to imprisonment for not
more than five years or a fine of not more than one hundred ten thousand dollars, or
both.
5. The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Content that is clearly artistic, parodic, satirical, or intended for legitimate
public interest or educational purposes, provided that the content includes a clear and
conspicuous notice stating that it is artificially generated or altered;
(2) Synthetic content created or shared without intent to harm and that does not
cause material injury to the dignity, reputation, or privacy of the person depicted; or
(3) Content used for bona fide research, journalism, or technological testing,
with appropriate safeguards and disclosure.
6. (1) Any verification or age-confirmation systems used shall comply with data
minimization and privacy-by-design principles.
(2) No biometric, facial recognition, or identification data collected for
compliance purposes shall be retained or sold by third parties.
7. (1) On or before August 28, 2028, the attorney general shall submit a report
to the general assembly assessing:
(a) The effectiveness and proportionality of penalties;
(b) The clarity and enforceability of definitions; and
(c) The impact on free speech, artistic expression, and research.
(2) The report shall include recommendations for updates or amendments based
on technological and legal developments.
✔